Hawaii statutes.
§304A-2672 Powers of the board.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the board may:

(1) Designate as a university project, any
undertaking, improvement, or facility on any one or more of the areas in one or
more of the educational institutions under the jurisdiction of the board;

(2) Construct and maintain university projects,
including a university project included or to be in a university system;
provided that all procurements for professional services furnished by licensees
under chapter 464 for construction projects shall be coordinated with the
department of accounting and general services on behalf of the board; provided
further that the department of accounting and general services shall not be
responsible for procurements determined by both the University of Hawaii and
the department of accounting and general services to be professional services
furnished by licensees under chapter 464 for repair and maintenance;

(3) Combine two or more university projects into a
university system on one or more of the areas on any one or more of the
educational institutions under the jurisdiction of the board, and to maintain
the system;

(4) Combine two or more university projects,
university systems, or university projects and university systems into a network,
on any one or more of the areas on any one or more of the educational
institutions under the jurisdiction of the board, and to maintain the network;

(5) Prescribe and collect rents, fees, and charges
for the use of or services furnished by any university project and the
facilities thereof, and pledge any appropriation to any university project and
the facilities thereof that in aggregate, produces revenue of the university at
least sufficient to comply with section 304A-2681;

(6) With the approval of the governor, issue revenue
bonds under this subpart in such principal amount as may be authorized by the
legislature from time to time to finance in whole or in part the cost of
construction or the cost of maintenance of any university project, including
funding reserves therefor;

(7) Pledge to the punctual payment of revenue bonds
and interest thereon, all or any part of the revenue of the university,
including any appropriation, in an amount sufficient to pay the revenue bonds
and interest as the same become due and to create and maintain reasonable
reserves therefor;

(8) Establish a loan program or a commercial paper
program upon terms and conditions that the board may determine; and

(9) Advance moneys of the university, not otherwise
required, and do any and all other lawful acts as may be necessary, convenient,
or desirable, for carrying into execution and administering this subpart. [L
2007, c 161, pt of §1; am L 2013, c 87, §4]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next